District of Columbia statutes.
16-4211

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act [15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ] or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act [15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ].

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Mediation Act.